Yamls-norm/V-arika_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - arika: # Verb pg 275 'eng set on fire, pt' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     arika+V+ScSg1+Oc3M: narikary # I set it on fire
     arika+V+ScSg1+Oc3F: narikaru # I set it on fire
     arika+V+ScSg1+OcSg2: narikai # I set you on fire
     arika+V+ScSg1+OcPl2: narikai # I set you on fire


     arika+V+ScPl1+Oc3M: ãarikary # we set it on fire
     arika+V+ScPl1+Oc3F: ãarikaru # we set it on fire
     arika+V+ScPl1+OcSg2: ãarikai # we set you on fire
     arika+V+ScPl1+OcPl2: ãarikai # we set you on fire
